Nevada, session 83, SB430.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 360 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 to 13, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 2. As used in sections 2 to 13, inclusive, of this act,
unless the context otherwise requires, the words and terms defined
in sections 3 to 8, inclusive, of this act have the meanings ascribed
to them in those sections.
Sec. 3. “Division” means the Housing Division of the
Department of Business and Industry.
Sec. 4. “Employer excise taxes” means the taxes imposed on
the wages paid by an employer pursuant to chapter 363B of NRS.
Sec. 5. “Local sales and use taxes” means the taxes imposed
on the gross receipts of any retailer from the sale of tangible
personal property sold at retail, or stored, used or otherwise
consumed, in the county in which the project is located. The term
does not include any taxes imposed by the Sales and Use Tax Act.
Sec. 6. “Participant” means a person who contributes to or
participates in the project, including, without limitation, a
contractor and subcontractor.
Sec. 7. “Project” means a project for the acquisition,
development and construction of at least 100 single-family
residences for households with an income of not more than 130
percent of the area median income.
Sec. 8. “Project sponsor” means a person who acquires an
ownership interest in a project and is designated by the
participants in the project to apply for a certificate of eligibility for
transferable tax credits or an abatement of employer excise taxes
or local sales and use taxes, or both, pursuant to section 9 of this
act.
Sec. 9. 1. On behalf of a project, the project sponsor may
apply to the Division for:
(a) A certificate of eligibility for transferable tax credits which
may be applied to employer excise taxes or local sales and use
taxes, or both.
(b) An abatement of employer excise taxes or local sales and
use taxes, or both.
2. For a project to be eligible for the transferable tax credits
described in paragraph (a) of subsection 1 and the abatement of
the taxes described in paragraph (b) of subsection 1, the project
sponsor must, on behalf of the project:
(a) Submit an application on a form prescribed by the
Division;
-
*SB430*

– 4 –
(b) Enter into a written agreement with the Division that
requires the project sponsor to sell each single-family residence in
the project for not more than the direct costs to acquire, develop
and construct the single-family residence to a household that will
occupy the residence and has an income of not more than 130
percent of the area median income; and
(c) Meet any other requirements prescribed by the Division.
3. Any participant may submit a request to the Administrator
of the Division to protect from disclosure any information in the
application which, under generally accepted business practices,
would be considered a trade secret or other confidential
proprietary information of the participant. After consulting with
the participant, the Administrator of the Division shall determine
whether to protect the information from disclosure. The decision
of the Administrator of the Division is final and is not subject to
judicial review. If the Administrator of the Division determines to
protect the information from disclosure, the protected
information:
(a) Is confidential proprietary information of the participant;
(b) Is not a public record;
(c) Must be redacted by the Administrator of the Division from
any copy of the application that is disclosed to the public; and
(d) Must not be disclosed to any person who is not an officer
or employee of the Division unless the participant consents to the
disclosure.
4. The Division may approve an application submitted
pursuant to subsection 1 if the Division finds that the project is
eligible pursuant to subsection 2.
5. The Division may adopt any regulations necessary to carry
out the provisions of sections 2 to 13, inclusive, of this act.
6. The Nevada Tax Commission may adopt any regulations
necessary to carry out the provisions of sections 2 to 13, inclusive,
of this act.
Sec. 10. 1. If the Division approves an application for a
certificate of eligibility for transferable tax credits submitted
pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection 1 of section 9 of this act,
the Division shall immediately forward a copy of the certificate of
eligibility which identifies the estimated amount of the tax credits
available pursuant to this section to:
(a) The project sponsor; and
(b) The Department.
2. A project may be approved for a certificate of eligibility for
transferable tax credits in an amount equal to the costs of
financial assistance provided by the project sponsor to purchasers
of single-family residences in the project.
-
*SB430*

– 5 –
3. The transferable tax credits issued to a project sponsor
pursuant to this section expire 4 years after the date on which the
transferable tax credits are issued to the project sponsor.
Sec. 11. 1. If the Division approves an application for an
abatement of employer excise taxes or local sales and use taxes, or
both, submitted pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 1 of
section 9 of this act, the Division shall immediately forward a
certificate of eligibility for the abatement to:
(a) The Department; and
(b) The Nevada Tax Commission.
2. The abatement for the project sponsor in the project must:
(a) For employer excise taxes, be for a duration of not more
than 10 years after the date on which the application is submitted
and in an amount that equals the amount of the employer excise
taxes that would otherwise be owed by each participant for
employees employed by the participant for the project; and
(b) For local sales and use taxes, be for a duration of not more
than 20 years after the date on which the application is submitted
and in an amount that equals the amount of the local sales and
use taxes that would otherwise be owed by each participant in the
project.
3. If the Division approves an abatement of local sales and
use taxes, the Division shall issue to the project sponsor a
document certifying the abatement which can be presented to
retailers at the time of sale. The document must clearly state the
rate of sales and use taxes which the purchaser is required to pay
in the county in which the abatement is effective.
Sec. 12. 1. The project sponsor shall, upon the request of
the Division, furnish the Division with copies of all records
necessary to verify that the project meets the eligibility
requirements for any transferable tax credits issued pursuant to
section 10 of this act and the abatement of any taxes approved
pursuant to section 11 of this act.
2. A project sponsor that is found to have submitted any false
statement or made any false representation in any document
submitted for the purpose of obtaining transferable tax credits
pursuant to sections 2 to 13, inclusive, of this act, or that otherwise
becomes ineligible for transferable tax credits after receiving the
transferable tax credits pursuant to sections 2 to 13, inclusive, of
this act shall repay to the Department any portion of the
transferable tax credits to which the project sponsor is not entitled.
3. Transferable tax credits purchased in good faith are not
subject to forfeiture or repayment by the transferee unless the
transferee submitted fraudulent information in connection with
the purchase.
-
*SB430*

– 6 –
4. Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter, if the
project sponsor of a project for which an abatement has been
approved pursuant to section 11 of this act and is in effect fails to
meet the requirements for eligibility pursuant to that section, the
project sponsor shall repay to the Department the amount of the
abatement that was allowed to the project sponsor pursuant to
section 11 of this act before the failure of the project sponsor to
meet the requirements for eligibility. Except as otherwise provided
in NRS 360.232 and 360.320, the project sponsor shall, in addition
to the amount of the abatement required to be repaid by the project
sponsor pursuant to this subsection, pay interest on the amount
due from the project sponsor at the rate most recently established
pursuant to NRS 99.040 for each month, or portion thereof, from
the last day of the month following the period for which the
payment would have been made had the abatement not been
approved until the date of payment of the tax.
5. The Secretary of State may, upon application by the
Administrator of the Division, revoke or suspend the state business
license of the project sponsor which is required to repay any
portion of transferable tax credits pursuant to subsection 2 or the
amount of any abatement pursuant to subsection 4 and which the
Division determines is not in compliance with the provisions of
this section governing repayment. If the state business license of
the project sponsor in a project is suspended or revoked pursuant
to this subsection, the Secretary of State shall provide written
notice of the action to the project sponsor. The Secretary of State
shall not reinstate a state business license suspended pursuant to
this subsection or issue a new state business license to the project
sponsor whose state business license has been revoked pursuant to
this subsection unless the Administrator of the Division provides
proof satisfactory to the Secretary of State that the project sponsor
is in compliance with the requirements of this section governing
repayment.
Sec. 13. The Division shall, on or before October 1 of each
year, prepare and submit to the Governor and to the Director of
the Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmittal to the Legislature
an annual report which includes, for the immediately preceding
fiscal year:
1. The number of applications submitted pursuant to section
9 of this act;
2. The number of projects for which an application was
approved;
3. The amount of transferable tax credits approved;
4. The amount of transferable tax credits used;
5. The amount of transferable tax credits transferred;
-
*SB430*

– 7 –
6. The amount of transferable tax credits taken against each
allowable tax, including the actual amount used and outstanding,
in total and for each project;
7. The number of abatements approved;
8. The dollar amount of the abatements; and
9. The number of single-family residences constructed in the
project.
Sec. 14. Chapter 361 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the initial
owner of a single-family residence constructed as part of a project
approved pursuant to sections 2 to 13, inclusive, of this act, may
apply to the county assessor for an exemption from taxation. Such
an initial owner may not apply for an exemption pursuant to this
section on or after July 1, 2055.
2. The county assessor shall approve an application
submitted pursuant to subsection 1 and grant an exemption from
taxation for a single-family residence specified in the application
if the application is submitted before July 1, 2055, and the county
assessor determines that each of the following criteria are
satisfied:
(a) The single-family residence is occupied by the initial
owner; and
(b) The single-family residence was constructed as part of a
project approved pursuant to sections 2 to 13, inclusive, of this act.
3. If, between July 1 and June 15, the county assessor
approves an application submitted pursuant to subsection 1, the
initial owner of the single-family residence is entitled to an
exemption from taxation beginning on July 1 of the next fiscal
year and the initial owner of the single-family residence is not
entitled to a refund of any taxes paid before that date.
4. If, after June 15 but on or before June 30, the county
assessor approves an application submitted pursuant to subsection
1, the initial owner of the single-family residence is entitled to an
exemption from taxation beginning on July 1 of the fiscal year
immediately following the next fiscal year and the initial owner of
the single-family residence is not entitled to a refund of any taxes
paid before that date.
5. If a single-family residence for which an exemption from
taxation is granted pursuant to this section is sold or transferred
in a transaction to which the provisions of chapter 375 of NRS
apply, the exemption from taxation must no longer be applied to
the single-family residence.
-
*SB430*

– 8 –
Sec. 15. Chapter 363B of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. Except as otherwise provided in section 11 of this act, a
participant that qualifies pursuant to the provisions of section 11
of this act is entitled to an exemption of the amount of tax
otherwise due pursuant to NRS 363B.110.
2. If an abatement from the taxes otherwise due pursuant to
NRS 363B.110 is approved by the Housing Division of the
Department of Business and Industry pursuant to section 11 of
this act, the abatement must be administered and carried out in the
manner set forth in sections 2 to 13, inclusive, of this act.
Sec. 16. Chapter 374 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. A participant in a project approved pursuant to sections 2
to 13, inclusive, of this act may apply to the Housing Division of
the Department of Business and Industry for an abatement from
the taxes imposed by this chapter on the gross receipts from the
sale, and the storage, use or other consumption, of eligible
machinery, equipment and supplies used to develop and construct
single-family residences for the project.
2. If an application for an abatement is approved, the
abatement must be administered and carried out in the manner set
forth in sections 2 to 13, inclusive, of this act.
Sec. 17. NRS 375.090 is hereby amended to read as follows:
375.090 The taxes imposed by NRS 375.020, 375.023 and
375.026 do not apply to:
1. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a mere
change in identity, form or place of organization, such as a transfer
between a business entity and its parent, its subsidiary or an
affiliated business entity if the affiliated business entity has identical
common ownership. The taxes imposed by NRS 375.020, 375.023
and 375.026 apply to a transfer described in this subsection if the
business entity to which the real property is transferred was formed
for the purpose of avoiding those taxes.
2. A transfer of title to the United States, any territory or state
or any agency, department, instrumentality or political subdivision
thereof.
3. A transfer of title recognizing the true status of ownership of
the real property, including, without limitation, a transfer by an
instrument in writing pursuant to the terms of a land sale installment
contract previously recorded and upon which the taxes imposed by
this chapter have been paid.
4. A transfer of title without consideration from one joint
tenant or tenant in common to one or more remaining joint tenants
or tenants in common.
-
*SB430*

– 9 –
5. A transfer, assignment or other conveyance of real property
if the owner of the property is related to the person to whom it is
conveyed within the first degree of lineal consanguinity or affinity.
6. A transfer of title between former spouses in compliance
with a decree of divorce.
7. A transfer of title to or from a trust without consideration if a
certificate of trust is presented at the time of transfer.
8. Transfers, assignments or conveyances of unpatented mines
or mining claims.
9. A transfer, assignment or other conveyance of real property
to a corporation or other business organization if the person
conveying the property owns 100 percent of the corporation or
organization to which the conveyance is made.
10. A conveyance of real property by deed which becomes
effective upon the death of the grantor pursuant to NRS 111.655 to
111.699, inclusive, and a Death of Grantor Affidavit recorded in the
office of the county recorder pursuant to NRS 111.699.
11. The making, delivery or filing of conveyances of real
property to make effective any plan of reorganization or adjustment:
(a) Confirmed under the Bankruptcy Act, as amended, 11 U.S.C.
§§ 101 et seq.;
(b) Approved in an equity receivership proceeding involving a
railroad, as defined in the Bankruptcy Act; or
(c) Approved in an equity receivership proceeding involving a
corporation, as defined in the Bankruptcy Act,
 if the making, delivery or filing of instruments of transfer or
conveyance occurs within 5 years after the date of the confirmation,
approval or change.
12. A transfer to an educational foundation. As used in this
subsection, “educational foundation” has the meaning ascribed to it
in subsection 3 of NRS 388.750.
13. A transfer to a university foundation. As used in this
subsection, “university foundation” has the meaning ascribed to it in
subsection 3 of NRS 396.405.
14. A transfer to a library foundation. As used in this
subsection, “library foundation” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 379.0056.
15. A transfer to a person who is the initial purchaser of a
single-family residence in a project approved pursuant to sections
2 to 13, inclusive, of this act.
Sec. 18. Chapter 111 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
The initial purchaser of a single-family residence in a project
approved pursuant to sections 2 to 13, inclusive, of this act shall
-
*SB430*

– 10 –
not sell the single-family residence to a corporation, limited-
liability company or affiliate of such an entity.
Sec. 19. NRS 239.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
239.010 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section and
NRS 1.4683, 1.4687, 1A.110, 3.2203, 41.0397, 41.071, 49.095,
49.293, 62D.420, 62D.440, 62E.516, 62E.620, 62H.025, 62H.030,
62H.170, 62H.220, 62H.320, 75A.100, 75A.150, 76.160, 78.152,
80.113, 81.850, 82.183, 86.246, 86.54615, 87.515, 87.5413,
87A.200, 87A.580, 87A.640, 88.3355, 88.5927, 88.6067, 88A.345,
88A.7345, 89.045, 89.251, 90.730, 91.160, 116.757, 116A.270,
116B.880, 118B.026, 119.260, 119.265, 119.267, 119.280,
119A.280, 119A.653, 119A.677, 119B.370, 119B.382, 120A.640,
120A.690, 125.130, 125B.140, 126.141, 126.161, 126.163, 126.730,
127.007, 127.057, 127.130, 127.140, 127.2817, 128.090, 130.312,
130.712, 136.050, 159.044, 159A.044, 164.041, 172.075, 172.245,
176.01334, 176.01385, 176.015, 176.0625, 176.09129, 176.156,
176A.630, 178.39801, 178.4715, 178.5691, 178.5717, 179.495,
179A.070, 179A.165, 179D.160, 180.600, 200.3771, 200.3772,
200.5095, 200.604, 202.3662, 205.4651, 209.392, 209.3923,
209.3925, 209.419, 209.429, 209.521, 211A.140, 213.010, 213.040,
213.095, 213.131, 217.105, 217.110, 217.464, 217.475, 218A.350,
218E.625, 218F.150, 218G.130, 218G.240, 218G.350, 218G.615,
224.240, 226.462, 226.796, 228.270, 228.450, 228.495, 228.570,
231.069, 231.1285, 231.1473, 232.1369, 233.190, 237.300,
239.0105, 239.0113, 239.014, 239B.026, 239B.030, 239B.040,
239B.050, 239C.140, 239C.210, 239C.230, 239C.250, 239C.270,
239C.420, 240.007, 241.020, 241.030, 241.039, 242.105, 244.264,
244.335, 247.540, 247.545, 247.550, 247.560, 250.087, 250.130,
250.140, 250.145, 250.150, 268.095, 268.0978, 268.490, 268.910,
269.174, 271A.105, 281.195, 281.805, 281A.350, 281A.680,
281A.685, 281A.750, 281A.755, 281A.780, 284.4068, 284.4086,
286.110, 286.118, 287.0438, 289.025, 289.080, 289.387, 289.830,
293.4855, 293.5002, 293.503, 293.504, 293.558, 293.5757, 293.870,
293.906, 293.908, 293.909, 293.910, 293B.135, 293D.510, 331.110,
332.061, 332.351, 333.333, 333.335, 338.070, 338.1379, 338.1593,
338.1725, 338.1727, 348.420, 349.597, 349.775, 353.205,
353A.049, 353A.085, 353A.100, 353C.240, 353D.250, 360.240,
360.247, 360.255, 360.755, 361.044, 361.2242, 361.610, 365.138,
366.160, 368A.180, 370.257, 370.327, 372A.080, 378.290, 378.300,
379.0075, 379.008, 379.1495, 385A.830, 385B.100, 387.626,
387.631, 388.1455, 388.259, 388.501, 388.503, 388.513, 388.750,
388A.247, 388A.249, 391.033, 391.035, 391.0365, 391.120,
391.925, 392.029, 392.147, 392.264, 392.271, 392.315, 392.317,
392.325, 392.327, 392.335, 392.850, 393.045, 394.167, 394.16975,
394.1698, 394.447, 394.460, 394.465, 396.1415, 396.1425, 396.143,
-
*SB430*

– 11 –
396.159, 396.3295, 396.405, 396.525, 396.535, 396.9685,
398A.115, 408.3885, 408.3886, 408.3888, 408.5484, 412.153,
414.280, 416.070, 422.2749, 422.305, 422A.342, 422A.350,
425.400, 427A.1236, 427A.872, 427A.940, 432.028, 432.205,
432B.175, 432B.280, 432B.290, 432B.4018, 432B.407, 432B.430,
432B.560, 432B.5902, 432C.140, 432C.150, 433.534, 433A.360,
439.4941, 439.4988, 439.5282, 439.840, 439.914, 439A.116,
439A.124, 439B.420, 439B.754, 439B.760, 439B.845, 440.170,
441A.195, 441A.220, 441A.230, 442.330, 442.395, 442.735,
442.774, 445A.665, 445B.570, 445B.7773, 449.209, 449.245,
449.4315, 449A.112, 450.140, 450B.188, 450B.805, 453.164,
453.720, 458.055, 458.280, 459.050, 459.3866, 459.555, 459.7056,
459.846, 463.120, 463.15993, 463.240, 463.3403, 463.3407,
463.790, 467.1005, 480.535, 480.545, 480.935, 480.940, 481.063,
481.091, 481.093, 482.170, 482.368, 482.5536, 483.340, 483.363,
483.575, 483.659, 483.800, 484A.469, 484B.830, 484B.833,
484E.070, 485.316, 501.344, 503.452, 522.040, 534A.031, 561.285,
571.160, 584.655, 587.877, 598.0964, 598.098, 598A.110,
598A.420, 599B.090, 603.070, 603A.210, 604A.303, 604A.710,
604D.500, 604D.600, 612.265, 616B.012, 616B.015, 616B.315,
616B.350, 618.341, 618.425, 622.238, 622.310, 623.131, 623A.137,
624.110, 624.265, 624.327, 625.425, 625A.185, 628.418, 628B.230,
628B.760, 629.043, 629.047, 629.069, 630.133, 630.2671,
630.2672, 630.2673, 630.2687, 630.30665, 630.336, 630A.327,
630A.555, 631.332, 631.368, 632.121, 632.125, 632.3415,
632.3423, 632.405, 633.283, 633.301, 633.427, 633.4715, 633.4716,
633.4717, 633.524, 634.055, 634.1303, 634.214, 634A.169,
634A.185, 634B.730, 635.111, 635.158, 636.262, 636.342, 637.085,
637.145, 637B.192, 637B.288, 638.087, 638.089, 639.183,
639.2485, 639.570, 640.075, 640.152, 640A.185, 640A.220,
640B.405, 640B.730, 640C.580, 640C.600, 640C.620, 640C.745,
640C.760, 640D.135, 640D.190, 640E.225, 640E.340, 641.090,
641.221, 641.2215, 641A.191, 641A.217, 641A.262, 641B.170,
641B.281, 641B.282, 641C.455, 641C.760, 641D.260, 641D.320,
642.524, 643.189, 644A.870, 645.180, 645.625, 645A.050,
645A.082, 645B.060, 645B.092, 645C.220, 645C.225, 645D.130,
645D.135, 645G.510, 645H.320, 645H.330, 647.0945, 647.0947,
648.033, 648.197, 649.065, 649.067, 652.126, 652.228, 653.900,
654.110, 656.105, 657A.510, 661.115, 665.130, 665.133, 669.275,
669.285, 669A.310, 670B.680, 671.365, 671.415, 673.450, 673.480,
675.380, 676A.340, 676A.370, 677.243, 678A.470, 678C.710,
678C.800, 679B.122, 679B.124, 679B.152, 679B.159, 679B.190,
679B.285, 679B.690, 680A.270, 681A.440, 681B.260, 681B.410,
681B.540, 683A.0873, 685A.077, 686A.289, 686B.170, 686C.306,
687A.060, 687A.115, 687B.404, 687C.010, 688C.230, 688C.480,
-
*SB430*

– 12 –
688C.490, 689A.696, 692A.117, 692C.190, 692C.3507, 692C.3536,
692C.3538, 692C.354, 692C.420, 693A.480, 693A.615, 696B.550,
696C.120, 703.196, 704B.325, 706.1725, 706A.230, 710.159,
711.600, and section 9 of this act, sections 35, 38 and 41 of chapter
478, Statutes of Nevada 2011 and section 2 of chapter 391, Statutes
of Nevada 2013 and unless otherwise declared by law to be
confidential, all public books and public records of a governmental
entity must be open at all times during office hours to inspection by
any person, and may be fully copied or an abstract or memorandum
may be prepared from those public books and public records. Any
such copies, abstracts or memoranda may be used to supply the
general public with copies, abstracts or memoranda of the records or
may be used in any other way to the advantage of the governmental
entity or of the general public. This section does not supersede or in
any manner affect the federal laws governing copyrights or enlarge,
diminish or affect in any other manner the rights of a person in any
written book or record which is copyrighted pursuant to federal law.
2. A governmental entity may not reject a book or record
which is copyrighted solely because it is copyrighted.
3. A governmental entity that has legal custody or control of a
public book or record shall not deny a request made pursuant to
subsection 1 to inspect or copy or receive a copy of a public book or
record on the basis that the requested public book or record contains
information that is confidential if the governmental entity can
redact, delete, conceal or separate, including, without limitation,
electronically, the confidential information from the information
included in the public book or record that is not otherwise
confidential.
4. If requested, a governmental entity shall provide a copy of a
public record in an electronic format by means of an electronic
medium. Nothing in this subsection requires a governmental entity
to provide a copy of a public record in an electronic format or by
means of an electronic medium if:
(a) The public record:
(1) Was not created or prepared in an electronic format; and
(2) Is not available in an electronic format; or
(b) Providing the public record in an electronic format or by
means of an electronic medium would:
(1) Give access to proprietary software; or
(2) Require the production of information that is confidential
and that cannot be redacted, deleted, concealed or separated from
information that is not otherwise confidential.
5. An officer, employee or agent of a governmental entity who
has legal custody or control of a public record:
-
*SB430*

– 13 –
(a) Shall not refuse to provide a copy of that public record in the
medium that is requested because the officer, employee or agent has
already prepared or would prefer to provide the copy in a different
medium.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 239.030, shall, upon
request, prepare the copy of the public record and shall not require
the person who has requested the copy to prepare the copy himself
or herself.
Sec. 20. The Legislature hereby finds that the exemption
provided by this act from any ad valorem tax on property:
1. Will achieve a bona fide social or economic purpose and that
the benefits of the exemption are expected to exceed any adverse
effect of the exemption on the provision of services to the public by
the State or a local government that would otherwise receive
revenue from the tax from which the exemption would be granted;
and
2. Will not impair adversely the ability of the State or a local
government to pay, when due, all interest and principal on any
outstanding bonds or any other obligations for which revenue from
the tax from which the exemption would be granted was pledged.
Sec. 21. The provisions of NRS 218D.380 do not apply to any
provision of this act which adds or revises a requirement to submit a
report to the Legislature.
Sec. 22. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1 to 21, inclusive, of this act become effective upon
passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any regulations
and performing any other preparatory administrative tasks that are
necessary to carry out the provisions of this act, and on October 1,
2025, for all other purposes, and expire by limitation on October 1,
2055.
H
-
*SB430*